Massachusetts, session 194th, H1421.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 15C of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 30. (a) There shall be within the authority a student debt relief grant program, to
be known as the John F. Kennedy Service Scholarship, for Massachusetts residents who have
completed a volunteer program with the Peace Corps, AmeriCorps, or Commonwealth Corps.
(b) To be eligible for a grant award under the program, an applicant shall: (i) be a resident
of the commonwealth; (ii) have successfully completed at least 1 volunteer program approved by
the authority with the Peace Corps, AmeriCorps, or Commonwealth Corps; (iii) be employed by
the commonwealth, a municipal government within the commonwealth, an office of the federal
government located in the commonwealth or a nonprofit organization located in the
commonwealth; and (iv) have an annual income equal to or less than the commonwealth’s
annual median income as determined by the authority.
of 2

(c) An applicant who meets the requirements set forth in subsection (b) shall be eligible
for a grant award, subject to appropriation, equal to 100 per cent of their outstanding student
debt up to the amount of $5,000.
(d) The authority may promulgate rules and regulations necessary for the implementation
of this section.
of 2